District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2708

Imposition of civil fines, penalties, and fees; adjudications.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1887, ch. 272, § 8
as added Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 482, 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1238, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2408.